Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB253.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1302 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 1302. Vehicles exempt from registration.The following types of vehicles are exempt from registration:* * *(24) Any new or leased motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle and motorized bicycle, with an estimated average miles per gallon for city driving at or above 40 miles per gallon, as determined in accordance with the 2024 Fuel Economy Guide published by the United States Environmental Protection Agency and the United States Department of Energy. The exemption under this paragraph may only apply to the first two years of the vehicle's registration, after which 123456789101112131415161718 the vehicle shall be treated as the specified vehicle classification as identified by the department.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0253PN0164 - 2 - 123